Illinois, session 104th, HB1903.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Human 5Trafficking Order of Protection Act. 6    Section 3. Purpose and construction. The purpose of this 7Act is to protect the safety of victims of human trafficking 8and the safety of their family and household members and to 9minimize the trauma and inconvenience associated with 10attending separate and multiple civil court proceedings to 11obtain orders of protection. This Act shall be interpreted in 12accordance with the constitutional rights of crime victims set 13forth in Article I, Section 8.1 of the Illinois Constitution, 14the purposes set forth in Section 2 of the Rights of Crime 15Victims and Witnesses Act, and the use of orders of protection 16to implement the victim's right to be reasonably protected 17from the defendant as provided in Section 4.5 of the Rights of 18Victims and Witnesses Act. 19    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:20    "Electronic" means any method of transmission of 21information between computers or other machines designed for 22the purpose of sending or receiving electronic transmission   HB1903- 2 -LRB104 07482 RLC 17525 b1and that allows for the recipient of information to reproduce 2the information received in a tangible medium of expression.3    "Electronic appearance" means an appearance in which one 4or more of the parties are not present in the court, but in 5which, by means of an independent audio-visual system, all of 6the participants are simultaneously able to see and hear 7reproductions of the voices and images of the judge, counsel, 8parties, witnesses, and any other participants. 9    "Human trafficking" means a violation of:10        (1) subsection (b) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal 11    Code of 2012 (involuntary servitude);12        (2) subsection (c) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal 13    Code of 2012 (involuntary sexual servitude of a minor); or14        (3) subsection (d) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal 15    Code of 2012 (trafficking in persons).16    "Independent audio-visual system" means an electronic 17system for the transmission and receiving of audio and visual 18signals, including those with the means to preclude the 19unauthorized reception and decoding of the signals by 20commercially available television receivers, channel 21converters, or other available receiving devices.  22    Section 10. Persons who may bring actions. The following 23persons may bring an action under this Act:24    (1) a person who is a victim of human trafficking 25regardless of the relationship between the victim and the   HB1903- 3 -LRB104 07482 RLC 17525 b1trafficker; or2    (2) a person on behalf of a minor child or an adult who has 3been the victim of human trafficking. 4    Section 15. Commencement of action; filing fees; 5dismissal. 6    (a) Actions for human trafficking orders of protection are 7commenced:8        (1) Independently, by filing a petition for a human 9    trafficking order of protection in the circuit court, 10    unless otherwise designated by local rule or order. 11        (2) In conjunction with another civil proceeding, by 12    filing a petition for a human trafficking order of 13    protection under the same case number as another civil 14    proceeding involving the parties.15        (3) In conjunction with a delinquency petition or a 16    criminal prosecution, by filing a petition for a human 17    trafficking order of protection under the same case number 18    as the delinquency petition or a criminal case involving 19    the parties.20    (b) When a petition for an emergency human trafficking 21order of protection is filed, the petition shall not be 22publicly available until the petition has been served on the 23respondent.24    (c) No fee shall be charged by the clerk for filing, 25amending, vacating, certifying, or photocopying petitions or   HB1903- 4 -LRB104 07482 RLC 17525 b1orders, for issuing alias summons, or for any related filing 2service. No fee shall be charged by the sheriff for service by 3the sheriff of a petition, rule, motion, or order in an action 4commenced under this Section.5    (d) Withdrawal or dismissal of any petition for a human 6trafficking order of protection prior to adjudication where 7the petitioner is represented by the State shall operate as a 8dismissal without prejudice. No action for a human trafficking 9order of protection shall be dismissed because the respondent 10is being prosecuted for a crime against the petitioner. An 11independent action may be consolidated with another civil 12proceeding, as provided by paragraph (2) of subsection (a).13    For any action commenced under paragraph (2) or (3) of 14subsection (a), dismissal of the conjoined case (or a finding 15of not guilty) shall not require dismissal of the action for 16the human trafficking order of protection; instead, action for 17the human trafficking order of protection may be treated as an 18independent action and, if necessary and appropriate, 19transferred to a different court or division. Dismissal of any 20conjoined case shall not affect the validity of any previously 21issued human trafficking order of protection.22    (e) The court shall provide, through the office of the 23clerk of the court, simplified forms and clerical assistance 24to help with the writing and filing of a petition under this 25Section by any person not represented by counsel. In addition, 26that assistance may be provided by the State's Attorney.  HB1903- 5 -LRB104 07482 RLC 17525 b1    (f) The Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts, with 2the approval of the Supreme Court, may adopt rules to 3establish and implement a pilot program to allow the 4electronic filing of petitions for temporary human trafficking 5orders of protection and the issuance of such orders by 6audio-visual means to accommodate litigants for whom 7attendance in court to file for and obtain emergency relief 8would constitute an undue hardship or would constitute a risk 9of harm to the litigant. 10    Section 20. Application of rules of civil procedure. 11    (a) Any proceeding to obtain, modify, reopen, or appeal a 12human trafficking order of protection, whether commenced alone 13or in conjunction with a civil or criminal proceeding, shall 14be governed by the rules of civil procedure of this State. The 15standard of proof in such a proceeding is proof by a 16preponderance of the evidence, whether the proceeding is heard 17in criminal or civil court. The Code of Civil Procedure and 18Supreme Court and local court rules applicable to civil 19proceedings shall apply, except as otherwise provided by this 20Act.21    (b) There shall be no right to trial by jury in any 22proceeding to obtain, modify, vacate, or extend any human 23trafficking order of protection under this Act. However, 24nothing in this Section shall deny any existing right to trial 25by jury in a criminal proceeding.  HB1903- 6 -LRB104 07482 RLC 17525 b1    (c) A petition for a human trafficking order of protection 2may be filed in any county where: (i) the petitioner resides; 3(ii) respondent resides; or (iii) the alleged human 4trafficking occurred.5    (d) Objection to venue is waived if not made within such 6time as respondent's response is due, except as otherwise 7provided in this Section. In no event shall venue be deemed 8jurisdictional.9    (e) Any action for a human trafficking order of 10protection, whether commenced alone or in conjunction with 11another proceeding, is a distinct cause of action and requires 12that a separate summons be issued and served, except that in 13pending cases the following methods may be used:14        (1) by delivery of the summons to respondent 15    personally in open court in pending civil or criminal 16    cases; or17        (2) by notice in civil cases in which the defendant 18    has filed a general appearance.19    The summons shall be in the form prescribed by Supreme 20Court Rule 101(d), except that it shall require the respondent 21to answer or appear within 7 days. Attachments to the summons 22or notice shall include the petition for the human trafficking 23order of protection and supporting affidavits, if any, and any 24emergency human trafficking order of protection that has been 25issued. The enforcement of a human trafficking order of 26protection shall not be affected by the lack of service,   HB1903- 7 -LRB104 07482 RLC 17525 b1delivery, or notice.  2    Section 25. Remedies. The court may provide relief as 3follows:4    (1) prohibit the respondent from knowingly coming within, 5or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from the 6petitioner;7    (2) restrain the respondent from having any contact, 8including nonphysical contact, with the petitioner directly, 9indirectly, or through third parties, regardless of whether 10those third parties know of the order;11    (3) prohibit the respondent from knowingly coming within, 12or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from the 13petitioner's residence, school, day care, or other specified 14location;15    (4) order the respondent to stay away from any property or 16animal owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by the 17petitioner and forbid the respondent from taking, 18transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or otherwise 19disposing of the property or animal; and20    (5) order any other injunctive relief as necessary or 21appropriate for the protection of the petitioner.